Utah statutes.
4-37-201.   Certificate of registration required to operate an aquaculture facility.

(1)  A person may not operate an aquaculture facility without first obtaining a certificate of registration from the department.

(2) (a)  Each application for a certificate of registration to operate an aquaculture facility shall be accompanied by a fee.

(b)  The fee shall be established by the department in accordance with Section 63J-1-504.

(3)  The department shall coordinate with the Division of Wildlife Resources:

(a)  on the suitability of the proposed site relative to potential impacts on adjacent aquatic wildlife populations; and

(b)  in determining which species the holder of the certificate of registration may propagate, possess, transport, or sell.

(4)  The department shall list on the certificate of registration the species which the holder may propagate, possess, transport, or sell.

